Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2405YH (3) 91 ll/jh H.F. 481 Section 1. Section 562B.14, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 7. a. Each tenant shall be notified, in writing, of any 3 rent increase at least ninety days before the effective date. 4 Such effective date shall not be sooner than the expiration 5 date of the original rental agreement or any renewal or 6 extension thereof. 7 b. The landlord shall not increase the amount of rent more 8 than once per calendar year unless reasonably necessary for one 9 or more of the following reasons: 10 (1) An increase in insurance premiums paid by the tenant to 11 the landlord under the rental agreement. 12 (2) An increase in infrastructure-related expenses of the 13 manufactured home community or mobile home park paid by the 14 tenant to the landlord under the rental agreement. 15